02_Morphology/Hindi/hindi_prefix.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%> ! Morpheme boundary

%<n%> ! Noun
@P.Neg.1@
@R.Neg.1@

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Prefix;

LEXICON N
%<n%>: # ;
@R.Neg.1@%<n%>: @R.Neg.1@ # ;

LEXICON Nouns

प्रिय:प्रिय N ; ! "love"

LEXICON Prefix
@P.Neg.1@:@P.Neg.1@अति%> Nouns;
